Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-270
County board; duties; how determined.

In the absence of any special provision governing the board of supervisors, such board shall be governed by and perform all the duties and have all the powers applicable to county boards as provided by the general laws of this state.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 73, p. 153;

R.S.1913, § 1054;

C.S.1922, § 956;

C.S.1929, § 26-270;

R.S.1943, § 23-270.

In a county under township organization, the board of supervisors may create new towns. State ex rel. Town of Ewing v. Town of Golden, 99 Neb. 782, 157 N.W. 971 (1916).